Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4103.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 4, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-492, to read: START_STATUTE15-492. School buildings; enrollment to enrollment capacity ratio; election eligibility A. Notwithstanding section 15-491, if the ratio of a school district's enrollment to the school district's enrollment capacity is less than fifty percent, the school district governing board may not Call an election to either: 1. Determine whether bonds of the school district may be issued and sold. 2. Change the list of capital projects or the purposes authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds. B. The ratio of A school district's enrollment to the school district's enrollment capacity is equal to the school district's average daily membership as prescribed in section 15-901 for the prior year divided by the number of students who can be educated in the school district's existing school buildings, as calculated by the school facilities oversight board cONSISTENT WITH THE MINIMUM SCHOOL FACILITY ADEQUACY GUIDELINES ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO SECTION 41-5711.  THE SCHOOL FACILITIES OVERSIGHT BOARD MAY NOT INCLUDE IN THE CALCULATION PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION ANY EXISTING BUILDING THAT THE SCHOOL DISTRICT LEASES AS LESSOR IF THE LESSEE USES THE BUILDING TO PROVIDE INSTRUCTION TO STUDENTS IN KINDERGARTEN PROGRAMS OR ANY OF GRADES ONE THROUGH TWELVE.END_STATUTE